Utah statutes.
17-18-5.   Requirements of office.

(1) A person filing a declaration of candidacy for the office of county attorney or district attorney shall:

(a) be a United States citizen;

(b)  be an attorney licensed to practice law in Utah who is an active member in good standing of the Utah State Bar;

(c) be a registered voter in the county or prosecution district in which he is elected to the office; and

(d) (i)  have been, as of the date of the election,  a resident of the county or prosecution district in which he seeks office for at least one year; or

(ii) have been appointed and, at the time of filing, be serving as county or district attorney and have become a resident of the county or prosecution district within 30 days after appointment to the office.

(2) Each person appointed to the office of county attorney or district attorney shall be:

(a) a United States citizen; and

(b) an attorney licensed to practice law in Utah who is an active member in good standing of the Utah State Bar.



Amended by Chapter 139, 1997 General Session

